Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1513.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 79A.05.605 and 1969 ex.s. c 55 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:There is established for the recreational use and enjoyment of the public the Washington State Seashore Conservation Area. It shall include all lands now or hereafter under state ownership or control lying between Cape Disappointment and Leadbetter Point; between Toke Point and the South jetty on Point Chehalis; and between Damon Point and the Makah Indian Reservation and occupying the area between the ((line of)) ordinary high ((tide))water line and the line of extreme low tide, as these lines now are or may hereafter be located, and, where applicable, between the Seashore Conservation Line, as established by survey of the Washington state parks and recreation commission and the line of extreme low tide, as these lines now are or may hereafter be located; and shall also include all state-owned nontrust accreted lands along the ocean: PROVIDED, That no such conservation area shall include any lands within the established boundaries of any Indian reservation.Sec. 2. RCW 79A.05.640 and 2000 c 11 s 52 are each amended to read as follows:Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply to RCW 79A.05.600 through 79A.05.695.(1) "Local government" means a county, city, or town.(2) "Ocean beaches" include the three ocean beaches described in RCW 79A.05.605.(3) "Ordinary high water line" means the mark on the shores of all water that will be found by examining the bed and banks and ascertaining where the presence and action of waters are so common and usual, and so long continued in ordinary years as to mark upon the soil or vegetation a character distinct from the abutting upland, except in any area where the ordinary high water line cannot be found, the ordinary high water line adjoining salt water is the line of mean higher high tide and the ordinary high water line adjoining fresh water is the line of mean high water.(4) "Pedestrian use" means any use that does not involve a motorized vehicle.Sec. 3. RCW 79A.05.650 and 2000 c 11 s 54 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in RCW 79A.05.655 and 79A.05.660, a total of forty percent of the length of the beach subject to the recreation management plan shall be reserved for pedestrian use under this section and RCW 79A.05.665. ((Restrictions))Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, restrictions on motorized traffic under this section shall be from April 15th to the day following Labor day of each year. Local jurisdictions may adopt provisions within recreation management plans that exceed the requirements of this section. The commission shall not require that a plan designate for pedestrian use more than forty percent of the land subject to the plan.(2)(a) All areas near salmon-bearing streams within the beach subject to the recreation management plan must be reserved for pedestrian use under this section and RCW 79A.05.665 during spawning season.(b) The commission shall consult with the department of fish and wildlife to:(i) Identify all stream areas within the beach subject to the recreation management plan that are salmon-bearing; and(ii) Determine the times of year salmon spawning is likely to occur.(3) In designating areas to be reserved for pedestrian use, the plan shall consider the following:(a) Public safety;(b) Statewide interest in recreational use of the ocean beaches;(c) Protection of shorebird and marine mammal habitats;(d) Preservation of native beach vegetation;(e) Protection of sand dune topography;(f) Prudent management of clam beds;(g) Economic impacts to the local community; and(h) Public access and parking availability.--- END ---